Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB869.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "record" in section 102 of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, is amended to read:Section 102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Record." Information, regardless of physical form or 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 characteristics, that documents a transaction or activity of an agency and that is created, received or retained pursuant to law or in connection with a transaction, business or activity of the agency. The term includes a document, paper, letter, map, book, tape, photograph, film or sound recording, information stored or maintained electronically and a data-processed or image-processed document. The term also includes communications sent by a public official to less than a quorum of the governing body of an agency.* * *Section 2. Section 502 of the act is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 502. Open-records officer.* * *(c) Registration.--An agency shall register the open-records officer with the Office of Open Records within 30 days of designation in a manner determined by the Office of Open Records.(d) Training.--The Office of Open Records shall develop and post on its website a training course for newly designated open-records officers. Within 30 days of designation, an open-records officer shall complete this training course, and the agency shall verify completion and post that verification on their agency website. For each successive calendar year, the agency open-records officer shall view or attend the Office of Open Records' annual training.Section 3. Section 507 of the act is amended to read:Section 507. Retention of Records.[Nothing] (a) Requirements.--(1) A n agency shall retain, or cause to be retained, for 20250SB0869PN0964 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 no less than two years from the date of creation or receipt, any record of the agency, whether permanent, nonpermanent or transitory, created or received electronically by a member, employee, official or agent of the agency.(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to the electronic receipt of subscriptions, mass marketing, spam or junk communications, nor to nonrecords that do not document a transaction or activity of an agency.(b) Confirmation at separation from service.--An agency shall obtain written or electronic confirmation from each member, employee, official or agent, upon the individual's separation from service with the agency, that all agency records subject to the agency's record retention policy or this act, including any records created or maintained on a personal device or account, have been provided to the agency.(c) Construction.--Except as otherwise provided in this section, nothing in this act shall be construed to modify, rescind or supersede any record retention policy or disposition schedule of an agency established pursuant to law, regulation, policy or other directive.Section 4. Section 1305 of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1305. Civil penalty.* * *(a.1) Failure to retain record.--A court shall impose a civil penalty of not more than $1,500 and shall award reasonable attorney fees and costs of litigation or an appropriate portion thereof on an agency or member, employee, official or agent of the agency if a public record was not retained, willfully or with wanton disregard or otherwise in bad faith violation of the 20250SB0869PN0964 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agency's record retention schedule or this act. An agency shall not make a payment on behalf of or reimburse a member, employee, official or agent of the agency for a fine or cost resulting from the member's, employee's, official's or agent's violation of this section.* * *Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0869PN0964 - 4 - 1234567